Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 3

Investigations of Police Officers

38-8-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means any municipality or county; and

“Police officer” means police officer as defined by law; however, this part shall exclude chiefs of police and sheriffs and any probationary member of any agency affected by this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 1.

Cross-References. Police officer defined, § 8-34-101.

38-8-302. Questioning — Information provided to officer being questioned.

Whenever an investigation by an agency focuses on matters that are likely to lead to the dismissal, demotion, suspension or transfer for punitive reasons of a police officer, the following conditions shall be complied with:

Any questioning of the officer shall take place at a reasonable time and place as designated by the investigating officer, preferably when the officer under investigation is on duty and at the office of the command of the investigating officer or at the office of the local precinct or police unit of the officer being investigated, unless circumstances dictate otherwise; and

Prior to being questioned, the officer shall be informed of:

The name and rank of the investigating officer and of any individual present during the questioning; and

The nature of the investigation.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 2.

38-8-303. Disclosures by officers.

No police officer shall be required or requested to disclose any item of property, income, assets, source of income, debts, or personal or domestic expenditures, including those of any member of the officer's family or household, unless such information is necessary in investigating a possible conflict of interest with respect to the performance of the officer's official duties, unless such disclosure is required by law, or unless such information is related to an investigation. Nothing in this section shall preclude an agency from requiring such police officer to disclose any place of off-duty employment and where the officer may be contacted.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 3.

38-8-304. Officer notified of charges and sanctions — Opportunity to respond — Counsel.

Before any dismissal, demotion, suspension without pay or transfer for punitive reasons may be imposed, the following must be complied with:

The police officer shall be notified in writing of all charges, the basis for the charges, and the action that may be taken;

The police officer shall be given an opportunity, within a reasonable time limit after the date of the written notice provided for in subdivision (1), to respond orally and in writing to the charges. The time limit shall be determined by the agency, but in no event shall it be less than five (5) calendar days unless agreed to by the police officer; and

In making a response, the police officer may be assisted by counsel at the officer's own expense.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 38-8-304 does not affect the process for issuing a written reprimand to a police officer unless the written reprimand takes one of the employment actions against a police officer described in T.C.A. § 38-8-304. OAG 13-64, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (8/22/13).

38-8-305. Proceedings subsequent to disciplinary action — Hearings — Evidence — Witnesses — Counsel — Record.

A police officer who is dismissed, demoted, suspended or transferred for punitive reasons, may within a reasonable amount of time following such action, as set by the officer's agency, request a hearing. If such request is made in a timely manner, a hearing shall be held within a reasonable amount of time set by the agency. The hearing shall be set no later than fourteen (14) calendar days following the date of request, unless a later date is acceptable to the police officer.

At the hearing, the police officer and the officer's agency shall be afforded the opportunity to present evidence and to examine and cross-examine witnesses.

The hearing panel shall have the power to, and on the request of either the police officer or the officer's agency shall, issue subpoenas requiring the testimony of witnesses who have refused or failed to appear at the hearing.

The police officer shall also be given the opportunity to be represented by counsel at the hearing, unless such officer and agency are afforded, by regulation, the right to counsel in a subsequent de novo hearing.

The panel conducting the hearing shall rule on the admissibility of the evidence.

A record shall be made of the hearing.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 5.

38-8-306. Suspension of officers.

Nothing in this part shall prevent the immediate suspension without pay of any police officer whose continued presence on the job is deemed to be a substantial and immediate threat to the welfare of the officer's agency or the public, nor shall anything in this part prevent the suspension of a police officer for refusing to obey a direct order issued in conformance with the agency's written and disseminated rules and regulations. In such case, the police officer shall, upon request, be afforded the rights provided for under this part within a reasonable amount of time set by the agency.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 6.

38-8-307. Minor infractions.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit the informal counseling of a police officer by a supervisor in reference to a minor infraction of policy or procedure that does not result in disciplinary action being taken against the police officer.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 7.

38-8-308. Rights deemed minimum rights — Agency grievance procedures — Additional rights.

The rights accorded police officers in this part shall be minimum rights and all agencies shall promulgate grievance procedures not inconsistent with this part. Any agency may provide for the rights of police officers in addition to this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 8.

38-8-309. Applicability of part.

This part shall apply only to those agencies that now provide a property interest in employment for their police officers and that have no other established procedures for dealing with the dismissal, demotion, suspension or transfer for punitive reasons of police officers.

Acts 1989, ch. 398, § 9.

38-8-310. Political activity.

No law enforcement officer, including any member of the Tennessee highway patrol, shall engage in political activity, support or opposition to any candidate, party or measure in any election when on duty or acting in the officer's or member's official capacity. When off duty and acting as a private citizen, no officer, including any member of the Tennessee highway patrol, shall be prohibited from engaging in political activity or denied the right to refrain from engaging in the activity.

Acts 1991, ch. 193, § 1; T.C.A. § 38–8–351; Acts 2006, ch. 1009, § 6.

Cross-References. Political activity by law enforcement officers and Tennessee highway patrol officers, § 4-7-120.

38-8-311. Investigative record of officer-involved shooting death.

After completion of an investigation into an officer-involved shooting death by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and after the completion of the prosecutorial function by the district attorney general, notwithstanding § 10-7-504 to the contrary, the investigative record of the incident shall become a public record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7. Notwithstanding § 10-7-504, the district attorney general may disclose all or part of the investigative record to the public prior to the record becoming a public record as provided in this section.

For purposes of this section, “officer-involved shooting death” means a death that results from a shooting by a law enforcement officer that occurs while the officer is on-duty or is off-duty while performing activities that are within the scope of the law enforcement officer's duties.

Acts 2017, ch. 277, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 277, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to officer-involved shooting deaths occurring on or after May 4, 2017.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 277, § 2. May 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

38-8-312. Community oversight board.

The authority of a community oversight board shall be limited to the review and consideration of matters reported to the board and the issuance of advisory reports and recommendations to the duly elected or appointed officials of the agencies involved in public safety and the administration of justice within the jurisdiction for which the community oversight board is established.

A community oversight board does not have the power to issue subpoenas for documents or to compel witness testimony.

This subsection (b) does not prohibit the issuance of a subpoena by a local legislative body as otherwise provided by law.

A subpoena issued by a local legislative body, on behalf of a community oversight board, must:

Be issued pursuant to majority vote of the local legislative body;

Not be issued in the form of a blanket authorization, but must specify each document to be produced or witness to testify; and

Not be issued for documents that are confidential under § 10-7-504.

Any employee or member of a community oversight board must be a registered voter, as defined by § 2-1-104(a)(24), of the jurisdiction for which the community oversight board is established.

A community oversight board shall not restrict or otherwise limit membership based upon demographics, economic status, or employment history.

Any document provided to a community oversight board that is confidential under § 10-7-504 or any other law shall be treated as confidential and shall not be released to the public.

By February 1 of each year, a community oversight board shall submit a report to the chairs of the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and senate, including, but not limited to, the following information for the previous calendar year:

The number and nature of matters reported to the board;

The number and nature of reviews conducted by the board; and

The number and nature of advisory reports and recommendations issued by the board.

As used in this section:

“Community oversight board” means a board or committee established by a local government to investigate or oversee investigation into possible law enforcement officer misconduct or the operations of an agency employing a law enforcement officer; and

“Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as defined in § 39-11-106.

Acts 2019, ch. 320, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 320, § 2 provided that a community oversight board in existence as of May 8, 2019, has until one (1) year from that date to comply with the membership requirements in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 320, § 3. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.